test/src/morphology/N-miiez_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - mīez*: # Noun 166 'eng /est mees/fin' - full paradigm
     mīez*+N+Sg+Nom: mīez*
     mīez*+N+Sg+Gen: mīʼe
     mīez*+N+Sg+Par: mīeztõ
     mīez*+N+Sg+Dat: mīʼen
     mīez*+N+Sg+Ins: mīʼekõks
     mīez*+N+Sg+Ill: mīʼezõ
     mīez*+N+Sg+Ela: mīʼestõ
     mīez*+N+Pl+Nom: mīʼed
     mīez*+N+Pl+Gen: mīʼed
     mīez*+N+Pl+Par: mēʼḑi
     mīez*+N+Pl+Dat: mīʼedõn
     mīez*+N+Pl+Ins: mīʼedkõks
     mīez*+N+Pl+Ill: mēʼži
     mīez*+N+Pl+Ela: mēʼšti
